District of Columbia statutes.
4-408

Waiver of overpayments.

The collection of an overpayment of not more than $25 may be waived for child development centers, child development homes, or in-home caregivers who are no longer providing day care services for the Department.

Sept. 19, 1979, D.C. Law 3-16, § 9, 26 DCR 20
1981 Ed., § 3-308.
1973 Ed., § 3-308.